Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Examination and Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

Sec. 08.68.160.
License required.

A person practicing or offering to practice registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nursing in the state shall submit evidence of qualification to practice and shall be licensed under this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 6 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For a temporary exception to the requirements of this section for certain persons providing treatment through telehealth during the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared on January 15, 2021, see sec. 8, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, substituted “registered, advanced practice registered,” for “professional”.

Sec. 08.68.165.
Malpractice insurance. [Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 08.68.170.
Qualifications of registered or practical nurse applicants.

An applicant for a license to practice registered nursing shall submit to the board, on forms and in the manner prescribed by the board, written evidence, verified by oath, that the applicant has successfully completed a registered nurse education program accredited by a national nursing accrediting body and approved by the board.

An applicant for a license to practice practical nursing shall submit to the board, on forms and in the manner prescribed by the board, written evidence, verified by oath, that the applicant has successfully completed

a practical nurse education program accredited by a national nursing accrediting body;

a practical nurse education program that meets the criteria established by the board under AS

08.68.100

; or

a registered nurse education program accredited by a national nursing accrediting body and approved by the board and, if the applicant has failed the registered nurse licensing examination, a practical nurse scope of practice course approved by the board.

An applicant for a license to practice advanced practice registered nursing shall submit to the board, on forms and in the manner prescribed by the board, written evidence, verified by oath, that the applicant

is licensed as a registered nurse in the state; and

has successfully completed an advanced practice registered nurse education program that meets the criteria established by the board under AS

08.68.100

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 105 SLA 1976; am § 8 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 5 ch 29 SLA 2014; am § 7 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, rewrote the section, specifying in greater detail the credentials required of registered and practical nurses.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, added (c).

Sec. 08.68.180.
Qualifications of certain practical nurse applicants. [Repealed, § 15 ch 29 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 08.68.190.
License by examination.

An applicant for a license to practice

registered or practical nursing shall pass a registered nursing or practical nursing licensing examination as prescribed by the board;

advanced practice registered nursing shall pass an advanced practice registered nursing certification examination as prescribed by the board.

If an applicant meets the qualifications set out in AS

08.68.170

for the license for which the applicant applied, the board shall issue a license to practice

registered or practical nursing to an applicant who passes the licensing examination to practice registered or practical nursing; or

advanced practice registered nursing to an applicant who passes the advanced practice registered nursing certification examination to practice advanced practice registered nursing.

History.

(§ 10 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 9 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 6 ch 29 SLA 2014; am § 8 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, substituted “a registered nursing or practical nursing licensing examination” for “a written examination”, inserted “licensing” following “an applicant who passes the”, deleted “and 08.68.180” near the end of the second sentence, and deleted the third sentence, related to frequency and location of examinations.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, rewrote the section.

Sec. 08.68.200.
License by endorsement.

The board may issue a license by endorsement to practice as a registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nurse, whichever is appropriate, to an applicant who has worked as a nurse within the past five years if the applicant is licensed as a registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nurse under the laws of another state if, in the opinion of the board, the applicant meets the qualifications required for licensing in the state and meets the requirements of AS

08.68.170

.

The board may issue a license by endorsement to practice as a registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nurse, whichever is appropriate, to an applicant who has not worked as a nurse within the past five years if the applicant meets the requirements of (a) of this section and

meets the continuing competency requirements of the board; or

completes a course of study approved by the board.

History.

(§ 11 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 10 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 4 ch 55 SLA 1987; am §§ 1, 2 ch 97 SLA 2002; am § 7 ch 29 SLA 2014; am § 9 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, deleted (a)(2), related to the Canadian Nurses’ Association testing service examination, and made related changes; in (b), substituted “requirements of (a)” for “requirements of either (a)(1) or (a)(2)”.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a), inserted “, advanced practice registered,” in two places, both following “registered”; in (b) inserted “, advanced practice registered,” preceding “or practical nurse”.

Sec. 08.68.210.
Temporary permits.

The board may issue a temporary permit, nonrenewable and valid for a period not exceeding six months, to an applicant for a license by endorsement if the applicant

submits proof satisfactory to the board that the applicant is currently licensed in another state under AS

08.68.200(a)

;

meets the requirements of AS

08.68.170

; and

pays the required fee.

The board may issue a nonrenewable permit to an applicant for license by examination if the applicant meets the qualifications of AS

08.68.170

. The permit is valid for a period not to exceed six months or the date on which the results of the licensing examination taken by the applicant are received by the applicant, whichever is sooner. If the applicant does not take the examination for which the applicant is scheduled, the permit lapses on the day of the examination.

History.

(§ 11 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 37 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 129 SLA 1974; am §§ 11, 12 ch 14 SLA 1982; am §§ 5, 6 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 3 ch 97 SLA 2002; am § 8 ch 29 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

For advanced nurse practitioner, see 12 AAC 44, art. 4.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (a)(1), deleted “or Canadian province or Canadian territory that administers an examination approved by the board” following “licensed in another state”, and substituted “AS

08.68.200(a)

” for “AS

08.68.200(a)

(2)”; in (b), in the first sentence, deleted “; or (2) is a graduate of a foreign school of nursing and has successfully completed the examination administered by the commission on graduates of foreign nursing schools” following “meets the qualifications of AS

08.68.170

”, rewrote the second sentence, which read, “The permit is valid for a period not extending beyond the time when the results are published of the first examination the applicant is eligible to take after the permit is issued; however, if the applicant does not take the examination for which the applicant is scheduled, the permit lapses on the day of the examination.”

Sec. 08.68.220.
Fees.

The Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for each of the following:

registered nursing:

application;

license by examination;

license by endorsement;

license renewal;

temporary permit;

practical nursing:

application;

license by examination;

license by endorsement;

license renewal;

temporary permit;

advanced practice registered nursing:

application;

license by certification examination;

license by endorsement;

license renewal;

temporary permit.

History.

(§ 13 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 80 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 94 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 81 SLA 1969; am §§ 3, 4 ch 37 SLA 1970; am § 13 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 40 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 10 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (2), deleted “or vocational” preceding “nursing” and added (3).

Sec. 08.68.230.
Use of title and abbreviation.

A person licensed to practice registered nursing in the state may use the title “registered nurse ” and the abbreviation “R.N”.

A person licensed to practice practical nursing in the state may use the title “licensed practical nurse” and the abbreviation “L.P.N.”

[Repealed, § 15 ch 29 SLA 2014.]

A person who holds a temporary permit to practice as a licensed practical nurse shall use the title “Temporary Licensed Practical Nurse” and the abbreviation “TLPN.”

A person licensed to practice advanced practice registered nursing in the state may use the title “advanced practice registered nurse” and the abbreviation “APRN.”

A person licensed to practice advanced practice registered nursing in the state as a

certified registered nurse anesthetist may use the title “certified registered nurse anesthetist” and the abbreviation “CRNA”;

certified clinical nurse specialist may use the title “clinical nurse specialist” and the abbreviation “CNS”;

certified nurse practitioner may use the title “certified nurse practitioner” and the abbreviation “CNP”; or

certified nurse midwife may use the title “certified nurse midwife” and the abbreviation “CNM.”

History.

(§ 14 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 14 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 7 ch 55 SLA 1987; am §§ 9, 15 ch 29 SLA 2014; am §§ 11, 12 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (b), deleted “or ‘licensed vocational nurse”’ following “‘licensed practical nurse”’, and “or ‘L.V.N.”’ following “and the abbreviation “‘L.P.N.”’; repealed (c).

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a), deleted “’licensed professional nurse,’” preceding “registered nurse” and made a stylistic change; added (e) and (f); inserted “or advanced practice registered” following “licensed registered”.

Sec. 08.68.240.
Nurses licensed or holding temporary permits under previous law. [Repealed, § 15 ch 29 SLA 2014.]

Sec. 08.68.250.
Renewal of license. [Repealed, § 3 ch 81 SLA 1969. For current law, see AS 08.01.100.]

Sec. 08.68.251.
Lapsed licenses.

A lapsed license may be reinstated if it has not remained lapsed for more than five years by payment of the license fees for the current renewal period and the penalty fee. The board, by regulation, shall establish continuing competency and criminal background check requirements for reinstatement of a lapsed license.

If a license is lapsed for more than five years, in addition to the requirements in (a) of this section,

the board shall require the applicant to complete a course of study approved by the board or to pass an examination prescribed by the board, and to pay the fees prescribed by this chapter; or

if the board determines that the person applying for reinstatement was actively employed in nursing in another state or jurisdiction during the time that the license has lapsed in this state, the license that has lapsed may be reinstated by payment of fees and completion of the other requirements in (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 81 SLA 1969; am § 6 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 16 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 8 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 10 ch 29 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

08.68.250

. Renumbered in 1969.

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (a), rewrote the second sentence, which read, “The person seeking reinstatement shall meet the continuing competency requirements of the board.”; added “in addition to the requirements in (a) of this section,” to the end of the introductory language in (b), in (b)(2) inserted “or jurisdiction” following “in another state”, and substituted “and completion of other requirements in (a) of this section” for “as required by (a) of this section”.

Sec. 08.68.260.
Inactive nurses. [Repealed, § 29 ch 14 SLA 1982. For current law, see AS 08.68.251.]

Sec. 08.68.265.
Supervision of practical nurses.

A practical nurse shall work under the supervision of a licensed registered or advanced practice registered nurse, a licensed physician, a licensed physician assistant, or a licensed dentist.

History.

(§ 17 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 11 ch 29 SLA 2014; am § 13 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, added “a licensed physician assistant,” near the end of this section.

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, inserted “or advanced practice registered” between “registered” and “nurse”.

Sec. 08.68.270.
Grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation.

The board may deny, suspend, or revoke the license of a person who

has obtained or attempted to obtain a license to practice nursing by fraud or deceit;

has been convicted of a felony or other crime if the felony or other crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the licensee;

habitually abuses alcoholic beverages, or illegally uses controlled substances;

has impersonated a registered, advanced practice registered, or practical nurse;

has intentionally or negligently engaged in conduct that has resulted in a significant risk to the health or safety of a client or in injury to a client;

practices or attempts to practice nursing while afflicted with physical or mental illness, deterioration, or disability that interferes with the individual’s performance of nursing functions;

is guilty of unprofessional conduct as defined by regulations adopted by the board;

has wilfully or repeatedly violated a provision of this chapter or regulations adopted under this chapter or AS 08.01;

is professionally incompetent;

denies care or treatment to a patient or person seeking assistance if the sole reason for the denial is the failure or refusal of the patient or person seeking assistance to agree to arbitrate as provided in AS

09.55.535(a)

;

has prescribed or dispensed an opioid in excess of the maximum dosage authorized under AS

08.68.705

; or

has procured, sold, prescribed, or dispensed drugs in violation of a law, regardless of whether there has been a criminal action or harm to the patient.

History.

(§ 20 ch 90 SLA 1957; am § 8 ch 129 SLA 1974; am § 30 ch 177 SLA 1978; am § 18 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 29 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 9 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 12 ch 29 SLA 2014; am § 14 ch 33 SLA 2016; am § 20 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

For advanced nurse practitioner, see 12 AAC 44, art. 4.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (8), substituted “adopted under this chapter or AS 08.01” for “adopted under it”.

The 2016 amendment, effective October 4, 2016, in (4), inserted “,advanced practice registered,” preceding “or practical”.

The 2017 amendment, effective July 26, 2017, added (11) and (12), and made a related change.

Sec. 08.68.275.
Disciplinary sanctions.

The board may take the following disciplinary actions singly or in combination:

permanently revoke a license or permit to practice;

suspend a license for a stated period of time;

censure a licensee;

issue a letter of reprimand;

impose limitations or conditions on the professional practice of a licensee;

impose peer review;

impose professional education requirements until a satisfactory degree of skill has been attained in those aspects of professional practice determined by the board to need improvement;

impose probation and require the licensee to report regularly to the board upon matters involving the basis for the probation;

accept a voluntary surrender of a license.

The board may withdraw probation status if it finds that the deficiencies that required the sanction have been remedied.

The board may summarily suspend a license before final hearing or during the appeals process if the board finds that the licensee poses a clear and immediate danger to the public health and safety. A person whose license is suspended under this section is entitled to a hearing conducted by the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) within seven days after the effective date of the order. If, after a hearing, the board upholds the suspension, the licensee may appeal the suspension to a court of competent jurisdiction.

The board may reinstate a license that has been suspended or revoked if the board finds, after a hearing, that the applicant is able to practice with skill and safety.

The board may return a license that has been voluntarily surrendered if the board determines that the licensee is competent to resume practice and that the applicable renewal fees are paid.

The board shall seek consistency in the application of disciplinary sanctions. A significant departure from prior decisions involving similar situations shall be explained in the findings of fact or order.

History.

(§ 18 ch 102 SLA 1976; am §§ 19, 29 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 10 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 19 ch 163 SLA 2004)

Cross references. —

For disciplinary powers of boards generally, see AS

08.01.075

.

Administrative Code. —

For advanced nurse practitioner, see 12 AAC 44, art. 4.

For disciplinary guidelines, see 12 AAC 44, art. 7.

Sec. 08.68.276.
Continuing competence required.

A license to practice nursing may not be renewed unless the nurse has complied with continuing competence requirements established by the board by regulation. The board shall adopt regulations for renewal of a license of an advanced practice registered nurse. The regulations must require that a licensee receive not less than two hours of education in pain management and opioid use and addiction in the two years preceding an application for renewal of a license unless the licensee has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board that the licensee does not currently hold a valid federal Drug Enforcement Administration registration number.

History.

(§ 20 ch 14 SLA 1982; am § 21 ch 2 SSSLA 2017)

Administrative Code. —

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

For continuing competency, see 12 AAC 44, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2018, added the second and third sentences.

Sec. 08.68.277.
Duty of employers to report.

An employer of a nurse licensed under this chapter or a nurse aide certified under this chapter practicing within the scope of that license or certification that discharges or suspends a nurse or nurse aide or conditions or restricts the practice of a nurse or nurse aide shall, within seven working days after the action, report to the board the name and address of the person and the reason for the action. An employer shall report to the board the name and address of a nurse or nurse aide who resigns while under investigation by the employer. The requirement of an employer to report under this section applies only to a discharge, suspension, or restriction of practice that is based on a ground allowing action by the board under AS

08.68.270

or

08.68.334

or for conduct prohibited under AS

08.68.340

.

Upon receipt of a report under (a) of this section, the board shall investigate the matter and take appropriate action under AS

08.68.275

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 29 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 29, SLA 2014, which enacted this section, took effect on September 16, 2014.

Sec. 08.68.278.
Immunity for certain reports to the board.

A person who, in good faith, reports information to the board relating to alleged incidents of incompetent, unprofessional, or unlawful conduct of a nurse licensed under this chapter, a nurse aide certified under this chapter, or an employer of a nurse licensed under this chapter or a nurse aide certified under this chapter who reports to the board the information required under AS

08.68.277

is not liable in a civil action for damages resulting from the reporting of the information.

History.

(§ 11 ch 55 SLA 1987; am § 14 ch 29 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, deleted “under oath and” following “A person who,” and inserted “licensed under this chapter, a nurse aide certified under this chapter or an employer of a nurse licensed under this chapter or a nurse aide certified under this chapter who reports to the board the information required under AS

08.68.277

” following “unlawful conduct of a nurse”.

Sec. 08.68.279.
Whistleblower protection for nurses concerning delegated duties.

An employer may not discharge, threaten, or otherwise discriminate against a nurse employed by the employer regarding the nurse’s compensation, terms, conditions, location, or privileges of employment for the nurse’s refusal to perform a task involving nursing care delegated to the nurse by the nurse’s superior if

the nurse alleges that the task was improperly delegated;

the nurse reports the attempted improper delegation to the board within 24 hours after the attempted delegation was made; and

the board finds that the task was improperly delegated.

History.

(§ 4 ch 97 SLA 2002)